Maryland, session 2026, SB0675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(p–1) “Investor–owned electric company” means an electric company that is not a
municipal electric utility or an electric cooperative.
(P–2) “INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY” MEANS A GAS COMPANY THAT IS
NOT A MUNICIPAL GAS UTILITY OR A GAS COOPERATIVE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
17–201.
(c) “Commissioner” means:
(1) the Commissioner of Labor and Industry;
(2) the Deputy Commissioner of Labor and Industry; or
(3) an authorized representative of the Commissioner.
(i) “Prevailing wage rate” means the hourly rate of wages paid in the locality as
determined by the Commissioner under § 17–208 of this subtitle.
17–208.
(a) (1) For each public work to which this subtitle applies, the Commissioner
shall determine the prevailing wage rate for each classification of worker engaged in work
of the same or a similar character.
(2) The Commissioner shall determine the prevailing wage rates for both
straight time and overtime.
(3) These determinations shall be made in accordance with:
(i) the applicable provisions of Title 10, Subtitles 1 through 3 of the
State Government Article; and
(ii) to the extent not inconsistent with those provisions, the
requirements of this section.

SENATE BILL 675 3
(4) IN DETERMINING A PREVAILING WAGE RATE UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER MAY NOT SURVEY OR USE WAGE DATA OF
EMPLOYEES DIRECTLY EMPLOYED BY:
(I) AN INVESTOR–OWNED GAS COMPANY, AS DEFINED UNDER §
1–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE;
(II) AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY, AS DEFINED
UNDER § 1–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE; OR
(III) A COMBINATION INVESTOR–OWNED GAS AND ELECTRIC
COMPANY.
(5) ON RECEIPT OF A PETITION FOR REVIEW OF A DETERMINATION
OF A PREVAILING WAGE RATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 17–211 OF THIS SUBTITLE
FOR A PREVAILING WAGE RATE DETERMINED USING WAGE DATA PROHIBITED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) VACATE THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE; AND
(II) RECALCULATE THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE AS REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the prevailing wage
rate for straight time for a worker is the rate paid:
(i) in the locality;
(ii) on projects similar to the proposed public work;
(iii) for work of the same or a similar character as that to be
performed on the public work; and
(iv) to 50% or more of the workers in the worker’s occupational
classification.
(2) The prevailing wage rate for overtime for a worker shall be at least time
and a half the prevailing wage rate for straight time for that worker.
(c) (1) If fewer than 50% of the workers in the locality working in the same
classification receive the same wage rate:
(i) the prevailing wage rate shall be the rate paid to at least 40% of
those workers; or

SENATE BILL 675
(ii) if fewer than 40% receive the same wage rate, the rate shall be a
weighted average rate obtained by:
1. adding the products obtained by multiplying each hourly
rate paid to workers in the classification by the number of workers receiving that rate; and
2. dividing that sum by the total number of workers in the
classification.
(2) If the Commissioner determines that there is not a substantial number
of competent workers engaged in similar work in the locality, the Commissioner shall
determine the prevailing wage rate based on the nearest locality within the State that most
closely approximates that locality in:
(i) population;
(ii) degree of industrialization; and
(iii) skill of work force.
(d) The calculation of the rate paid in the locality shall include the basic hourly
rate of pay and either:
(1) if a contractor is not required by law to provide fringe benefits, the
hourly rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or subcontractor to a third
person under a fund, plan, or program that provides:
(i) medical, surgical, or hospital care;
(ii) retirement, disability, or death benefits, including a profit
sharing plan that provides benefits on retirement;
(iii) unemployment, life, or accident insurance or compensation;
(iv) insurance or compensation for injury or illness resulting from
occupational activity;
(v) vacation and holiday pay;
(vi) subsidies to defray costs of apprenticeship or other similar
programs; or
(vii) other bona fide fringe benefits; or
(2) the hourly rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor that
reasonably may be anticipated in providing the fringe benefits specified in item (1) of this
subsection under an enforceable commitment to carry out a financially responsible plan or

SENATE BILL 675 5
program that is communicated in writing to the workers.
(e) An apprentice under a public work contract shall be paid at least the
percentage, set by the Council, of the prevailing wage rate for a mechanic in the trade in
which the apprentice is employed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.